apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="s/aber__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" i="yes"><p><l>e</l> <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>epo</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>apo</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abo</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abes</l>      <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>as</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>apes</l>      <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abe</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ape</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aben</l>      <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>apen</l>      <r>aber<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ap</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abe</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abé</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ape</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>apé</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>api</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>api</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>up</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_vid/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>úp</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_vid/e__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abe</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abé</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ape</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>apé</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>


  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>api</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ep</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>api</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ep</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ap</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>upi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ap</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>api</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ep</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>api</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ep</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ap</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ap</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>


  <e r="LR"><p><l>ap</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ab</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ap</l>        <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>abi</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>abe</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>api</l>       <r>aber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="zero__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="un/o__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="dos__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="vinti/un__num">
  <e>       <p><l>una</l>       <r>un<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ún</l>        <r>un<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uno</l>       <r>un<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="vinti/un__det">
  <e>       <p><l>una</l>       <r>un<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ún</l>        <r>un<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uno</l>       <r>un<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
    

<e r="LR" lm="vintiuno"> <p><l>venti</l>     <r>vinti</r></p><par n="vinti/un__det"/></e>
<e lm="vintiuno">        <i>vinti</i><par n="vinti/un__det"/></e>
<e lm="I">               <i>I</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="III">             <i>III</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="IX">              <i>IX</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="M">               <i>M</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="VIII">            <i>VIII</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIII">            <i>XIII</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">             <i>XIX</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVI">             <i>XVI</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII">           <i>XVIII</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXI">             <i>XXI</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="cient">    <p><l>cent</l>      <r>cient</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="cient">    <p><l>cent</l>      <r>ciento</r></p><par n="zero__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="zero">     <p><l>cero</l>      <r>zero</r></p><par n="zero__num"/></e>
<e lm="cient">           <i>cient</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="ciento">          <i>ciento</i><par n="zero__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinco">           <i>cinco</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="cinquanta"><p><l>cincuenta</l> <r>cinquanta</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="cinquanta"><p><l>cinqüenta</l> <r>cinquanta</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="quaranta"> <p><l>cuarenta</l>  <r>quaranta</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="quatro">   <p><l>cuatro</l>    <r>quatro</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="decinueu"> <p><l>dechinou</l>  <r>decinueu</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="deciueito"><p><l>dechiueit</l> <r>deciueito</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="decinueu">        <i>decinueu</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="deciueito"><p><l>deciocho</l>  <r>deciueito</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="decisiet">        <i>decisiet</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="deciséis"> <p><l>decisiéis</l> <r>deciséis</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="deciséis"> <p><l>deciséis</l>  <r>deciséis</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="diez">     <p><l>deu</l>       <r>diez</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dotze">    <p><l>doce</l>      <r>dotze</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dotze">    <p><l>dotse</l>     <r>dotze</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ueito">    <p><l>güeit</l>     <r>ueito</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ueito">    <p><l>güeito</l>    <r>ueito</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="nueu">     <p><l>nou</l>       <r>nueu</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="novanta">  <p><l>noventa</l>   <r>novanta</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="nueu">            <i>nueu</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="once">            <i>once</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="quatro">          <i>quatro</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="seis">            <i>seis</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="sixanta">  <p><l>sesenta</l>   <r>sixanta</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="deciséis"> <p><l>setse</l>     <r>deciséis</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="siet">            <i>siet</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="sixanta">  <p><l>sixanta</l>   <r>sixanta</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="tretze">   <p><l>tretse</l>    <r>tretze</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="ueito">           <i>ueito</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="uno">             <i>un</i><par n="un/o__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="vintiuno"> <p><l>venti</l>     <r>vinti</r></p><par n="vinti/un__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="vintiquatro"><p><l>venticuatre</l><r>vintiquatro</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="vintiueito"><p><l>ventigüeito</l><r>vintiueito</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="vintiquatro"><p><l>ventiquatre</l><r>vintiquatro</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="vintisiet"><p><l>ventisiete</l><r>vintisiet</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="vintiueito"><p><l>ventiueito</l><r>vintiueito</r></p><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="vintiuno">        <i>vinti</i><par n="vinti/un__num"/></e>
<e lm="vinticinco">      <i>vinticinco</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="vintidós">        <i>vintidós</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="vintinueu">       <i>vintinueu</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="vintiquatro">     <i>vintiquatro</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="vintisiet">       <i>vintisiet</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="vintiséis">       <i>vintiséis</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="vintiueito">      <i>vintiueito</i><par n="dos__num"/></e>
<e lm="zero">            <i>zero</i><par n="zero__num"/></e>
<e lm="saber">           <i>s</i><par n="s/aber__vblex"/></e>
